Alabama, session 2026rs, HB262.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Sections 40-26A-1 and 40-26A-2, Code of
Alabama 1975, are amended to read as follows:
"§40-26A-1
For the purpose of this chapter, the following terms
shall have the respective meanings ascribed to them by this
section except where the context clearly indicates a different
meaning:
(1) AUTHORIZED LOCATION. The current location of the
pari-mutuel licensees in Greene County, Jefferson County,
Macon County, Mobile County, the current location of the Class
C Bingo Permit holder in Houston County, and the bingo
facility in Lowndes County that was open prior to October 1,
2023, with a square footage building of 40,000 square feet.
(1)(2) COMMISSIONER. The Commissioner of the Department
of Revenue of the State of Alabama.
(2)(3) DEPARTMENT. The Alabama Department of Revenue.
(4) HISTORICAL RACING. A form of racing that creates
pari-mutuel pools from wagers placed on previously conducted
horse or greyhound races. The term includes historical horse
or greyhound racing on computerized machines, without regard
Page 2

or greyhound racing on computerized machines, without regard
HB262 INTRODUCED
to the type of graphics on the machine used to conduct the
activity.
(5) NET REVENUES. The total amount of money received as
a result of wagers placed at the authorized location on
historical racing, excluding free bets, and promotional
credits, less federal excise taxes, voided wagers, and the
total money or value in any form paid as prizes or winnings,
including the cash equivalent of any merchandise or thing of
value awarded as a prize..
(3)(6) PARI-MUTUEL. A system of betting on races
whereby the winners divide the total amount bet, after
deducting authorized taxes, fees, and management expenses, in
proportion to the sums wagered individually.
(4)(7) PARI-MUTUEL POOL. The total amount wagered under
the pari-mutuel betting system in any particular race."
"§40-26A-2
(a) In addition to any and all other taxes imposed by
law, there is hereby levied, upon every person engaged in the
business of operating a dog race track in the State of
Alabama, a privilege tax of one percent of the pari-mutuel
pool on all pari-mutuel races.
(b) In addition to the tax levied by subsection (a) and
in addition to any and all other taxes imposed by law, there
is hereby levied, upon every person engaged in the business of
operating a dog race track in the State of Alabama, a
privilege tax of one percent of the pari-mutuel pool on all
pari-mutuel races requiring the selection of three or more
racers; provided that the commission received by said
Page 3

racers; provided that the commission received by said
HB262 INTRODUCED
operator, after deducting local taxes in effect on September
28, 1988, shall not be reduced below the amount that said
operator received prior to the imposition of this tax.
(a) Effective October 1, 2026, there is levied on every
person engaged in the business of managing or facilitating
pari-mutuel wagering on historical racing a state privilege
tax of four percent of the person's net revenues. The tax
shall be due within 20 days after the end of each calendar
month and shall be collected by the Department of Revenue. The
tax on the net revenues collected under this subsection shall
be in lieu of all other state or local taxes. Nothing in the
levy of the tax under this subsection shall change the state
tax structure for live greyhound and thoroughbred racing as
well as simulcast live greyhound and thoroughbred racing
existing on October 1, 2026.
100 (c)(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of any local or
101 general act to the contrary, any dog race track licensee
102 authorized to conduct pari-mutuel racing shall be entitled to
103 retain as a commission from the pari-mutuel pool (the "take
104 out") an amount equal to 19 percent of all pari-mutuel pools
105 where a bettor is required to select two or less racers and an
106 amount equal to 21 percent where a bettor is required to
107 select three or more racers. The tax levied in this section is
108 not imposed to the extent that it would require a licensee to
109 increase the commissions above said amounts in order to
110 receive such tax from the pari-mutuel pool."
111 Section 2. Section 40-26A-2.1 is added to Chapter 26A
112 of Title 40, Code of Alabama 1975, to read as follows:
Page 4

of Title 40, Code of Alabama 1975, to read as follows:
HB262 INTRODUCED
113 40-26A-2.1
114 (a) Wagering on historical racing computerized machines
115 may be conducted only at an authorized location.
116 (b) Nothing in this section shall be construed to
117 authorize, permit, or expand any form of gambling activity
118 beyond that which is permitted by law on October 1, 2026.
119 Section 3. The following sections are repealed:
120 (1) Section 11-65-29, Code of Alabama 1975, imposing
121 the state horse wagering fee in Class 1 municipalities.
122 (2) Section 11-65-30, Code of Alabama 1975, imposing
123 the commission wagering fee in Class 1 municipalities.
124 (3) Section 11-65-35, Code of Alabama 1975, relating to
125 certain racing taxes in Class 1 municipalities.
126 (4) Section 45-44-150.12, Code of Alabama 1975,
127 imposing a tax due on pari-mutuel pools in Macon County,
128 Alabama.
129 (5) Section 45-32-150.13, Code of Alabama 1975,
130 imposing a tax on pari-mutuel pools in Greene County, Alabama.
131 (6) Section 45-49-151.14, Code of Alabama 1975,
132 imposing a tax on pari-mutuel pools in Mobile County, Alabama.
133 Section 4. This act shall become effective on October
134 1, 2026.
Page 5